New Jersey, session 222, S2539.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 10 of P.L.2014, c.31 (C.2A:162-24) is amended to read as follows: 10.  a. Upon motion of a prosecutor, when an eligible defendant is released from custody before trial pursuant to section 3 or 8 of P.L.2014, c.31 (C.2A:162-17 or C.2A:162-22), the court, upon a finding that the eligible defendant while on release has violated a restraining order or condition of release, or upon a finding of probable cause to believe that the eligible defendant has committed a new crime while on release, [may not]  shall revoke the eligible defendant's release and order that the eligible defendant be detained pending trial [unless the court, after considering all relevant circumstances including but not limited to the nature and seriousness of the violation or criminal act committed, finds clear and convincing evidence that no monetary bail, non-monetary conditions of release or combination of monetary bail and conditions would reasonably assure the eligible defendant's appearance in court when required, the protection of the safety of any other person or the community, or that the eligible defendant will not obstruct or attempt to obstruct the criminal justice process]. b.    [A court shall not revoke an eligible defendant's release and order that the eligible defendant be detained pending trial based on manufacturing, distributing, or dispensing, or possessing or having under control with intent to manufacture, distribute, or dispense, marijuana or hashish in violation of paragraph (12) of subsection b. of N.J.S.2C:35-5, or possession of marijuana or hashish in violation of paragraph (3) of subsection a. of N.J.S.2C:35-10.] (Deleted by amendment, P.L. , c. ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) (cf: P.L.2021, c.19, s.9) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.